Missouri, session 2026, HB2845.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 227, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 227.905, to read as follows:
227.905. The bridge on Business 63 crossing over U.S. Highway 60 in Howell
2 County shall be designated the "Jerrad Bennett Memorial Bridge". The department of
3 transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs designating such bridge, with
4 the costs to be paid by private donations.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.